src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-meqr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - meʼr: # Noun 83 'eng /est meri/fin' - full paradigm
     meʼr+N+Sg+Nom: [meʼr, mer]
     meʼr+N+Sg+Gen: [mieʼr, mier]
     meʼr+N+Sg+Par: mīerda
     meʼr+N+Sg+Dat: [mieʼrrõn, mierrõn]
     meʼr+N+Sg+Ins: [mieʼrkõks, mierkõks]
     meʼr+N+Sg+Ill: [mieʼrrõ, mierrõ]
     meʼr+N+Sg+Ela: [mieʼrstõ, mierstõ]
     meʼr+N+Pl+Nom: mierūd
     meʼr+N+Pl+Gen: mierūd
     meʼr+N+Pl+Par: meŗḑi
     meʼr+N+Pl+Dat: mierūdõn
     meʼr+N+Pl+Ins: mierūdõks
     meʼr+N+Pl+Ill: mierīž
     meʼr+N+Pl+Ela: [meʼŗšti, meŗšti]
